New York, session 2025-2026, A10940.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 13 of section 130.00 of the penal law, as 2 amended by chapter 636 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 13. "Mental health care provider" [shall mean] means any person who 5 is, or is required to be, licensed or registered or holds themself out 6 to be licensed or registered, or provides services as if they were 7 licensed or registered as a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, 8 registered professional nurse, licensed clinical social worker, licensed 9 master social worker under the supervision of a physician, psychologist 10 or licensed clinical social worker, licensed mental health counselor or 11 a licensed marriage and family therapist under any of the following: 12 article one hundred fifty-three, one hundred fifty-four, or one hundred 13 sixty-three of the education law. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15385-02-6